District of Columbia statutes.
16-2346

Certificate to Registrar.

(a)

Upon entry of a final judgment determining the parentage of a child, the clerk of the court shall forward a certificate to the Registrar of the District of Columbia, or his authorized representative in the jurisdiction in which the child was born, giving the names of the persons adjudged to be the parents of the child.

(b)

Repealed.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 592, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 545, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 20(e), 23 DCR 2544
Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 29(h), 28 DCR 3271
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 18-33, § 3(o), 56 DCR 4269
This section is referenced in § 16-2348.
1981 Ed., § 16-2346.
1973 Ed., § 16-2346.
D.C. Law 18-33, in subsec. (a), deleted “born out of wedlock” following “child”, and substituted “parents” for “father and mother”.